Utah statutes.
54-8-4.   Creation of local improvement districts authorized.
The governing body of every county is hereby authorized and empowered to
create local improvement districts under this chapter within the
unincorporated portion of such county, and the governing body of every city
and town is hereby authorized and empowered to create local improvement
districts under this chapter within its territorial limits:
To provide for the conversion of existing overhead electric and communication
facilities to underground locations and the construction, reconstruction or
relocation of any other electric or communication facilities which may be
incidental thereto, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
